California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(2) State that the order is being transmitted for filing.

(3) Request that the Office of Administrative Law publish a notice of the filing of the order and print an appropriate reference in Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 915, Sec. 2.   (AB 2786)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Certified Farmers’ Market Advisory Committee [47010. - 47013.]

47010.

(a) The secretary shall establish a committee that shall be known as the Certified Farmers’ Market Advisory Committee. The primary goals of the committee shall be all of the following:

(1) Promote the demand and consumption of agricultural products purchased directly from producers at certified farmers’ markets.

(2) Ensure that existing and future certified farmers’ markets are primarily maintained for the benefit of the producers selling their products within those markets.

(3) Ensure that honest and fair marketing of products
 occurs within certified farmers’ markets and within an ancillary vending activity under the operation and control of a certified farmers’ market operator.

(b) The committee shall be composed of 14 members and their alternates. The secretary shall endeavor to appoint six members and their alternates who shall be producers or representatives of agricultural organizations that represent producers, six members and their alternates who shall be certified farmers’ market operators or representatives of the operator, one public member, and one member and his or her alternate who shall be a county agricultural commissioner. An alternate member shall serve at a committee meeting only in the absence of, and shall have the same powers and duties as, the member for whom he or she is designated as alternate. All appointees shall serve two-year
 terms or at the pleasure of the secretary. Members appointed to fill vacancies shall serve the remainder of the term.

(c) The secretary shall make an effort to include members who represent geographical diversity and diverse agricultural products.

(d) The committee shall meet at the request of the secretary. It shall meet at least once each year.

(e) The committee may appoint its own officers, including a chairperson, a vice chairperson, a secretary, and any other officers it deems necessary. The committee may adopt rules that it deems are necessary for the conduct of its meetings and functions to carry out the objectives of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 579, Sec. 10.   (AB 1871)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

47011.

The Certified Farmers’ Market Advisory Committee shall be advisory to the secretary on matters pertaining to direct marketing of agricultural products at certified farmers’ markets and may make recommendations, including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) The amendment, repeal, or adoption of legislation and regulations that relate to the primary goals stated in subdivision (a) of Section 47010.

(b) Administrative policies and procedures that relate to the primary goals stated in subdivision (a) of Section 47010, including the inspection of producers and certified farmers’ markets.

(c) Administrative civil penalties for violations of certified farmers’ market laws and regulations.

(d) Program and enforcement fees collected pursuant to Section 47021.

(e) Statewide review of certified farmers’ market promotion and enforcement actions.

(f) The annual budget of the department’s certified farmers’ market program to carry out the goals and purposes of this chapter.

(g) Alternative strategies for certification and investigation methodology, and methods for industry self-regulation and commission formation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 579, Sec. 11.   (AB 1871)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

47013.

The members of the committee and any alternate shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed by the department for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 833, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Certificates [47020. - 47021.]

47020.

(a) An operator of a certified farmers’ market shall register with the department by applying for and obtaining a certificate from the county agricultural commissioner’s office in the county in which the certified farmers’ market is located. The application shall include the times and location of the farmers’ market, the name and contact information for the operator of the farmers’ market, and the agent for service of process for the operator. Upon approval of an application, the county agricultural commissioner shall issue to the operator a certified farmers’ market certificate.

(b) A certified farmers’ market certificate issued by a county agricultural commissioner shall be valid
 for up to 12 months from the date of issue, and may be renewed annually thereafter. The county agricultural commissioner shall inspect every certified farmers’ market within the commissioner’s jurisdiction at least once for every six months of operation. At the time of application or renewal, the county agricultural commissioner shall provide a schedule of fees that reflects an estimate of expenses for inspections and may charge a certification and inspection fee equal to the actual expenses incurred.

(c) (1) (A) Before selling at a certified farmers’ market, a producer shall register with the department by applying for and obtaining a certificate from the county agricultural commissioner’s office in the county in which the producer’s land or facility is located. The application shall include a
 declaration by the producer that the producer is knowledgeable of and intends to produce in accordance with good agricultural practices, as outlined in the Small Farm Food Safety Guidelines published by the department. Upon approval of an application, the county agricultural commissioner shall issue to the producer a certified producer’s certificate.

(B) A declaration made pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall not be used to infer that the producer is not required to comply with other state or federal laws relative to food safety and good agricultural practices.

(2) As part of obtaining or renewing a certified producer’s certificate, a producer farming fruit, vegetables, nuts, herbs, and similar crops shall annually submit to the county agricultural commissioner’s office in
 the county in which the producer’s land or facility is located information requested by the department about the specific crops that the producer will harvest or intends to harvest for sale directly to the public. The secretary may promulgate regulations specifying the information a producer is required to submit.

(3) A certified producer’s certificate issued by a county agricultural commissioner shall be valid for up to 12 months from the date of issue and may be renewed annually thereafter. The county agricultural commissioner in each county shall perform at
 least one onsite inspection for all new certified producer’s certificate applicants, and may perform additional inspections as needed of the property or properties listed on the certified producer’s certificate issued in the agricultural commissioner’s county as deemed appropriate by the county agricultural commissioner to verify production of the commodities being sold at a certified farmers’ market or the existence in storage of the producer’s actual harvested production, or both, of any product being sold at a certified farmers’ market. Where practical or purposeful, verification inspections shall be made when the actual harvest or sale of the commodity in question is occurring. The county agricultural commissioner shall provide to the producer a schedule of fees that reflects an estimate of expenses for
 certification or inspection at the time of application or renewal or before any needed additional verification inspection, and may charge a certification and inspection fee equal to the actual expenses incurred.

(d) Renewal of a certified farmers’ market certificate or certified producer’s certificate may be denied by either the department or a county agricultural commissioner if a certified farmers’ market or a producer is delinquent in the payment of the required state fee or a county certification and inspection fee or administrative civil penalty authorized pursuant to this chapter. The certificate may be eligible for renewal when all outstanding balances and associated penalties or administrative fines have been paid to the department or the respective county or counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 374, Sec. 3.   (AB 623)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

47021.

(a) Every operator of a certified farmers’ market shall remit to the department, within 30 days after the end of each quarter, a fee equal to the number of vendors participating and selling goods under the authority and management of the certified farmers’ market operator participating on each market day for the entire previous quarter. The fee shall be two dollars ($2) for each vendor whose products were presented for sale on each market day. A certified farmers’ market operator may directly recover all or part of the fee from the participating vendors. An operator of a certified farmers’ market located in a county with a population of less than 400,000 that allows only vendors of agricultural products produced by producers on land located in
 the same county as the certified farmers’ market may petition the secretary for a vendor fee of one dollar ($1). The petition shall include a statement of verification of the information upon which the petition is based by the county agricultural commissioner in the county where the certified farmers’ market is located.

(b) An operator of a certified farmers’ market who fails to pay the required fee within 30 days after the end of the quarter in which it is due shall pay to the department a monthly interest charge on the unpaid balance and a late penalty charge, to be determined by the department and not to exceed the maximum amount permitted by law.

(c) All fees collected
 pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund. The money generated by the imposition of the fees shall be used, upon appropriation by the Legislature, by the department to cover the reasonable costs to carry out this chapter, including all of the following actions undertaken by the department:

(1) The coordination of the Certified Farmers’ Market Advisory Committee or any ad hoc direct marketing advisory committee.

(2) The evaluation of county enforcement actions and assistance with regard to multiple county enforcement problems.

(3) The adoption of regulations to carry out the provisions of this chapter pertaining to certified farmers’ markets.

(4) Hearings from actions taken to enforce this chapter.

(5) The maintenance of a current statewide listing of certified farmers’ markets locations.

(6) The maintenance of a current statewide listing of producers who have been certified.

(7) The dissemination to all certified farmers’ markets information regarding the suspension or revocation of any producer’s certificate and the imposition of administrative penalties.

(8) Other actions, including the maintenance of special fund reserves, that are recommended by the Certified Farmers’ Market Advisory Committee or any ad hoc direct marketing advisory committee and approved by the department for
 purposes of carrying out this chapter pertaining to certified farmers’ markets.

(9) Investigation and enforcement expenses, including expenses incurred by any county agricultural commissioner for actions conducted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 579, Sec. 15.   (AB 1871)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Violations [47022. - 47022.7.]

47022.

It is unlawful for any person when operating under the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted thereunder to prepare, pack, place, deliver for shipment, deliver for sale, load, ship, transport, cause to be transported, or sell any products in bulk, or in any container or subcontainer, unless such products conform to the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 373, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

47022.1.

It is unlawful for any person when operating under the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted thereunder to deceptively prepare, pack, place, deliver for shipment, load, ship, transport, or sell any products.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 373, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

47022.2.

It is unlawful for any person when operating under the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted thereunder to mislabel any products, or place or have any false or misleading statement or designation of quality, grade, trademark, or trade name, on any wrapper or container, or on the label or lining of any container of any product, or on any placard that is used in connection with, or which has reference to, any products, bulk lot, bulk load, load, arrangement, or display of products.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 373, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

47022.3.

It is unlawful for any person when operating under the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted thereunder to falsify any documents or to make any statement, representation, or assertion orally, by public outcry, proclamation, or in writing, or by any other manner or means whatever, that concerns the quality, size, maturity, condition, or any other matter that relates to products which is false, deceptive, or misleading in any particular.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 373, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

47022.4.

It is unlawful for any person when operating under the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted thereunder to remove or dispose any products, or their containers to which any warning tag or notice has been affixed by an enforcing officer, or to remove the warning tag or notice from the place where it is affixed, except under a written permit to do so from an enforcing officer or under his or her specific direction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 373, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

47022.5.

It is unlawful for any person when operating under the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted thereunder to refuse to submit any container, subcontainer, load, or display of products to the inspection of an enforcing officer, or to refuse to stop any vehicle which contains products for the purpose of inspection by an enforcing officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 373, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

47022.6.

It is unlawful for any person when operating under the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted thereunder to refuse to submit to inspection by an enforcing officer of any property used in the sales, storage, or production of agricultural products.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 373, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

47022.7.

It is unlawful for any person when operating under the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted thereunder to alter in any respect any certified producer’s certificate, any certified farmers’ market certificate, any notice of violation, report, statement, or other document that is referred to in this chapter, which is issued by an enforcing officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 373, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Enforcement [47025. - 47025.]

47025.

(a) In lieu of prosecution, but not precluding suspension or revocation of certified producer’s certificates or certified farmers’ market certificates pursuant to any other authority, the secretary or the county agricultural commissioner may impose an administrative civil penalty, suspension of certification, or both, on a person who violates this chapter or any regulation implemented pursuant to this chapter.

(b) A civil penalty pursuant to this section shall be levied in proportion to the violation, measured as either “serious,” “moderate,” or “minor.”

(1) “Serious” violations are
 repeat or intentional violations, punishable by a civil penalty of not less than four hundred one dollars ($401) and up to a maximum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation.

(2) “Moderate” violations are repeat violations or violations that are not intentional, punishable by a civil penalty of not less than one hundred fifty-one dollars ($151), but not more than four hundred dollars ($400) per violation.

(3) “Minor” violations are violations that are procedural in nature, punishable by a civil penalty of not less than fifty dollars ($50), but not more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per violation.

(c) Before a civil penalty or suspension is imposed pursuant to this section, the person charged with the
 violation shall receive written notice of the proposed action including the nature of the violation and, if applicable, the amount of the proposed
 civil penalty. The person shall have the right to request a hearing within 20 days after receiving notice of the proposed action. A notice that is sent by certified mail to the last known address of the person charged shall be considered received even if delivery is refused or if the notice is not accepted at that address. If a hearing is requested, notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given at least 10 days before the date set for the hearing. At the hearing, the person shall be given an opportunity to review the commissioner’s evidence and to present evidence on his or her own behalf. If a hearing is not timely requested, the commissioner may take the action proposed without a hearing.

(d) If the person, upon whom the commissioner imposed a civil penalty or suspension, requested and appeared at a hearing,
 the person may appeal the commissioner’s decision to the secretary within 30 days of the date of receiving a copy of the commissioner’s decision. The following procedures apply to the appeal:

(1) The appeal shall be in writing and signed by the appellant or his or her authorized agent, state the grounds for the appeal, and include a copy of the commissioner’s decision. The appellant shall file a copy of the appeal with the commissioner at the same time it is filed with the secretary.

(2) The appellant and the commissioner, at the time of filing the appeal or within 10 days thereafter or at a later time prescribed by the secretary, may present the record of the hearing and a written argument to the secretary stating the ground for affirming, modifying, or reversing the
 commissioner’s decision.

(3) The secretary may grant oral arguments upon application made at the time written arguments are filed.

(4) If an application to present an oral argument is granted, written notice of the time and place for the oral argument shall be given at least 10 days before the date set therefor. The times may be altered by mutual agreement of the appellant, the commissioner, and the secretary.

(5) The secretary shall decide the appeal on the record of the hearing, including the written evidence and the written argument described in paragraph (2), that he or she has received. If the secretary finds substantial evidence in the record to support the commissioner’s decision, the secretary shall affirm the
 decision.

(6) The secretary shall render a written decision within 45 days of the date of appeal or within 15 days of the date of oral arguments or as soon thereafter as practical.

(7) On an appeal pursuant to this section, the secretary may affirm the commissioner’s decision, modify the commissioner’s decision by reducing or increasing the amount of the civil penalty levied, if applicable, so that it is within the secretary’s guidelines for imposing civil penalties, or reverse the commissioner’s decision. Any civil penalty increased by the secretary shall not be higher than that proposed in the commissioner’s notice of proposed action given pursuant to subdivision (c). A copy of the secretary’s decision shall be delivered or mailed to the appellant and the commissioner.

(8) Any person who does not request a hearing with the commissioner pursuant to a civil penalty or suspension imposed under subdivision (c) may not file an appeal to the secretary pursuant to this subdivision.

(9) Review of a decision of the secretary may be sought by the appellant within 30 days of the date of the decision pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) After the exhaustion of the appeal and review of procedures provided in this section, the commissioner, or his or her representative, may file a certified copy of a final decision of the commissioner that directs the payment of a civil penalty or provides for the imposition of a suspension, and, if applicable, a copy of any decision of
 the secretary, or his or her authorized representative, rendered on an appeal from the commissioner’s decision and a copy of any order that denies a petition for a writ of administrative mandamus, with the clerk of the superior court of any county. Judgment shall be entered immediately by the clerk in conformity with the decision or order. No fees shall be charged by the clerk of the superior court for the performance of any official service required in connection with the entry of judgment pursuant to this section.

(f) In addition to the civil penalties prescribed in subdivision (b), or a suspension imposed pursuant to this section, the appellant may be required to cover the cost of the administrative hearing unless the decision of the secretary or county agricultural commissioner is overturned.

(g) “Person,” as used in this section, means any applicant for a certified producers’ certificate or certified farmers’ market certificate, producer of agricultural products, certified producer, family member or employees of a certified producer, certified farmers’ market manager, or certified farmers’ market operator engaged or involved in the direct marketing of agricultural products at a certified farmers’ market pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 223, Sec. 1.   (AB 3260)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Other Direct Marketing Outlets and Distributions [47030. - 47050.]

47030.

Field retail stands are producer-owned and operated premises located at or near the point of production established in accordance with local ordinances and land use codes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 447, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

47050.

Farm stands arefield retail stands, as defined in Section 47030, that sell or offer for sale California agricultural products grown or produced by the producer, and also sell or offer for sale nonpotentially hazardous prepackaged food products from an approved source or bottled water or soft drinks. All agricultural products, processed or otherwise, sold at a farm stand shall be consistent in manner and character with the intent of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 447, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Community-Supported Agriculture [47060. - 47062.]

47060.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Community-supported agriculture program” or “CSA program” means a program under which a registered California direct marketing producer, or a group of registered California direct marketing producers, grow food for a group of California consumer shareholders or subscribers who pledge or contract to buy a portion of the future crop, animal production, or both, of a registered California direct marketing producer or a group of registered California direct marketing producers.

(b) “Single-farm community-supported agriculture program” means a program in which all delivered farm products originate from and are produced
 at the farm of one registered California direct marketing producer, and no more than a de minimis amount of delivered farm products originate at the farms of other registered California direct marketing producers.

(c) “Multi-farm community-supported agriculture program” means a program in which all delivered farm products originate from and are produced at one or more farms of a group of registered California direct marketing producers who declare their association as a group at the time of their annual certification or by amending the annual certification during the year.

(d) “Farm” means a farm operated by a registered California direct marketing producer or a group of registered California direct marketing producers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 62.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

47061.

(a) A producer that markets whole produce, shell eggs, or processed foods through a single-farm community-supported agriculture program or multi-farm community-supported agriculture program shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Register annually with the department as a California direct marketing producer, which shall include both of the following:

(A) A statement specifying whether the producer is part of a single-farm community-supported agriculture program or multi-farm community-supported agriculture program.

(B) (i) A declaration by the producer that he or she is
 knowledgeable and intends to produce in accordance with good agricultural practices, as outlined in the small farm food safety guidelines published by the department.

(ii) A declaration made pursuant to this subparagraph shall not be used to infer that the producer is not required to comply with any other state or federal laws relative to food safety and good agricultural practices.

(2) Label the consumer box or container used to deliver farm products to the consumer with the name and address of the farm delivering the box or container.

(3) Maintain the consumer boxes or containers in a condition that prevents contamination.

(4) Inform consumers, either by including a printed list in the consumer box or container or by delivering a list electronically
 to the consumer, of the farm of origin of each item in the consumer box or container.

(5) Maintain records that document the contents and origin of all of the items included in each consumer box or container, in accordance with department regulations.

(6) Comply with all labeling and identification requirements for shell eggs and processed foods imposed pursuant to the provisions of the Health and Safety Code, including, but not limited to, the farm’s name, physical address, and telephone number.

(b) A registered California direct marketing producer that is in compliance with this section and in good standing shall be deemed an approved source, as defined in Section 113735 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) A potentially hazardous food, as defined in
 Section 113871 of the Health and Safety Code, shall not be included in a consumer box distributed pursuant to this article unless that food has been produced, processed, and handled pursuant to all applicable federal, state, and local food safety requirements.

(d) Poultry and rabbit meat produced pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 25401) of Division 12, and other meats produced pursuant to Chapter 4.1 (commencing with Section 18940) of Part 3 of Division 9, that are marketed under this chapter shall comply with handling requirements established in the small farm food safety guidelines published by the department, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 47062.

(e) An enforcement officer, as defined in Section 113774 of the California Retail Food Code (Part 7 (commencing with Section 113700) of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code) may enter into
 and inspect a community-supported agriculture program in response to a public food safety complaint. The enforcement officer may recover reasonable costs associated with that inspection from the registered California direct marketing producer operating the community-supported agriculture program.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to remove the responsibility of a community-supported agriculture program from obtaining all required permits and licenses, including, but not limited to, a produce handler license or a cottage food permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 63.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

47062.

(a) The fee for, or the fee for amendment to, the annual registration of a registered California direct marketing producer shall be set by regulation enacted by the secretary that is reflective of the actual cost of the processing of registration or amendment to the registration, but in no event shall
 either fee exceed one hundred dollars ($100) annually.

(b) Fees collected pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund and shall be used by the department for the administration of this article. Administration of this article shall include all of the following:

(1) Create and maintain a registration system for California direct marketing producers.

(2) In consultation with the State Department of Public Health and local health officers or designees, publish, periodically update, and post on the Department of Food and Agriculture’s Internet Web site small farm food safety guidelines on, but not limited to, safe production,
 processing, and handling of both nonpotentially hazardous and potentially hazardous foods.

(3) Coordination expenses incurred relative to meetings of any ad hoc direct marketing advisory committee established by the secretary.

(c) All or part of the annual registration fee shall be waived if fees are paid by a California direct marketing producer to the department for registration or certification under any other program under the purview of this chapter.

(d) The provisions of this article shall be complied with regardless of any waiver of fees granted.

(e) The adoption, amendment, or repeal of any fee pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. An order to adopt, amend, or repeal regulations concerning the fee pursuant to this section shall be transmitted within 30 days by the secretary to the Office of Administrative Law. The Office of Administrative Law shall file the order promptly with the Secretary of State without further review pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 11349) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The order shall contain all of the following:

(1) Indicate that the regulations are adopted, amended, or repealed pursuant to this
 chapter.

(2) State that the order is being transmitted for filing.

(3) Request that the Office of Administrative Law publish a notice of the filing of the order and print an appropriate reference in Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 404, Sec. 2.   (AB 224)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Navel and Valencia Oranges [48000. - 48003.]

48000.

The handling and marketing of California citrus is affected with the public interest. The provisions of this chapter are enacted for the protection of the industry and for the purposes of protecting the health and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 180, Sec. 1.   Effective September 6, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

48001.

(a) There is in the department the California Citrus Advisory Committee.

(b) The committee shall be comprised as follows:

(1) Eight producers.

(A) Five producer members shall be engaged in the production of navel or Valencia oranges; four of which shall be engaged in the production of navel or Valencia oranges in the San Joaquin Valley, and two of the four members shall be engaged in the production of navel or Valencia oranges in Tulare County.

(B) Two producer members shall be engaged in the
 production of lemons, one of which is engaged in the production of lemons in Ventura County.

(C) One of the members shall be engaged in the production of mandarin citrus.

(2) Four handlers, which have their principal place of business located in one of the following counties: Fresno, Kern, Madera, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, Santa Clara, Tulare, and Ventura.

(A) Two handler members shall be located in the San Joaquin Valley.

(B) One handler member shall be engaged in the handling of lemons in Ventura County.

(c) The committee shall be appointed by the secretary from nominations submitted to the secretary by members of the navel orange, Valencia orange, lemon, and mandarin citrus
 industries group.

(d) Committee members may be compensated for reasonable expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties, as determined by the committee and concurred in by the secretary.

(e) The committee shall meet at the request of the secretary, the committee chairperson, or upon the request of three committee members.

(f) The committee shall appoint a chairperson, one or more vice chairpersons, and any other officers it deems necessary.

(g) The committee shall develop and make recommendations to the secretary on all matters regarding the implementation of this chapter including:

(1) The assessment rate as specified in Section 48002.

(2) Procedures for implementing an inspection program that shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) Mandatory hold for inspection prior to shipping, following a citrus freeze.

(B) The minimum number of inspections to be conducted, and the duration of each inspection period.

(C) The minimum number of samples to be taken.

(D) Statistical analysis of compliance levels and determination of an acceptable level of compliance.

(E) Documentation of inspection data including the number of inspectors, number of inspections performed, and budget information relating to expenses of personnel, mileage, and overhead costs.

(F) Monitoring and postevaluation of program effectiveness by the secretary.

(G) Development of a single memorandum of understanding between the department and all county agricultural commissioners for the counties specified in subdivision (b).

(3) Determinations as to which counties have met the inspection requirements.

(4) Procedures for implementing a state crop estimating and acreage survey.

(h) The secretary shall accept the recommendations of the committee if he or she determines that the recommendations are practicable and in the interest of the industry and the public. The secretary shall provide the committee within 30 days of receipt of the recommendations with a written statement
 of reasons if he or she does not accept any of the recommendations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 365, Sec. 1.   (AB 1795)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

48002.

(a) In addition to any other assessment, fees, or charges that may be required pursuant to this code, producers of navel oranges, Valencia oranges, lemons, or mandarin citrus varieties grown in this state and prepared for fresh market in the Counties of Fresno, Kern, Madera, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, Santa Clara, Tulare, and Ventura shall pay an assessment that shall not exceed 11 mills ($0.011) per carton for navel oranges, 5 mills ($0.005) per carton for lemons, and 6 mills ($0.006) per carton for Valencia oranges and mandarin citrus. The assessment shall be:

(1) Commencing April 1, 2011, recommended annually by the committee and submitted to the secretary for approval in
 amounts not to exceed those specified above.

(2) Based on the number of 40-pound carton equivalents produced.

(3) Used to reimburse agricultural commissioners, pursuant to a contract between the department and the commissioners, in the counties specified in this section, who meet the requirements of the inspection program as determined by the committee and concurred in by the secretary.

(4) Used to establish a reserve to fund the frost inspection program. The reserve amount shall be determined by the committee.

(5) Used to fund a program within the department to provide the industry with a state crop estimating service and an acreage survey.

(6) Collected from the producer by the first
 handler. For the purposes of this chapter, “producer” means a grower of navel oranges, Valencia oranges, lemons, or mandarin citrus and “handler” means a person or entity who receives navel oranges, Valencia oranges, lemons, or mandarin citrus from a producer and who prepares the oranges, lemons, or mandarin citrus for fresh market. If a producer prepares the oranges, lemons, or mandarin citrus for market, the producer shall be deemed the handler.

(7) Remitted to the department by the first handler, along with an assessment form, at the end of each month during the marketing season.

(8) Deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund or, upon the recommendation of the committee, deposited in accordance with Section 227 or Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 230) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 1.

(b) In
 no case shall:

(1) The total amount reimbursed to all counties exceed the total amount collected from the producers in all counties, unless reserve moneys are required for the frost inspection program. However, the authorized expenditures shall not exceed the combined total of reserve moneys and revenue received in that fiscal year.

(2) The reimbursement to any county exceed the amount approved by the committee and concurred in by the secretary.

(c) If the inspection program is terminated and there are insufficient funds to cover the cost of terminating the inspection program, the assessment shall continue until all those costs are recovered.

(d) The committee may recommend to the secretary an assessment less than the amount specified in subdivision (a)
 or that no assessment be collected from growers of navel oranges, Valencia oranges, lemons, or mandarin citrus varieties if no inspection program or crop survey exists for that particular orange or citrus variety. If no assessment is collected from an orange or citrus variety that has a representative on the committee, the secretary may designate a representative to the committee from an orange or citrus variety that is assessed.

(e) The adoption, amendment, or repeal of assessment rates pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. An order to adopt, amend, or repeal the regulations concerning assessment rates pursuant to this section shall be transmitted within 30 days by the secretary to the Office of Administrative Law. The Office of Administrative Law shall file the order promptly with the Secretary of State without